Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3833
(UTC 407) Evidence of oral trust.

(UTC 407) Except as required by a statute other than the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code, a trust need not be evidenced by a trust instrument, but the creation of an oral trust and its terms, or an amendment or revocation of an oral trust, may be established only by clear and convincing evidence.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 33.